Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201671-9302
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Home Care Consumer Bill of Rights Act:

(1) Home care consumer means any person who receives home care services and who is (a) sixty years of age or older or (b) a person with disabilities and is younger than sixty years of age. Home care consumer shall also include the parent or guardian of the home care consumer when the consumer is a minor child;

(2) Home care services means home and community-based services the purposes of which are to promote independence and reduce the necessity for residence in a long-term care facility, including, but not limited to, personal care services designed to assist an individual in the activities of daily living such as bathing, exercising, personal grooming, and getting in and out of bed, and which are provided under the medicare program under Title XVIII of the federal Social Security Act, as amended, the medicaid program under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, as amended, or any other public or private program providing home care services; and

(3) Provider of home care services means a public or private organization that provides home care services or arranges for the provision of home care services by an independent contractor.

Laws 2016, LB698, § 2.
July 21, 2016